Mississippi, session 2026, HB1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-41-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-41-27.  (1)  The local school boards, subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education, may: (a)  Permit the use of publicly owned school buses for the transportation of participating students, teachers, coaches and sponsors in connection with athletic events, events of boys' and girls' clubs, events of Future Farmers of America or 4-H Clubs and special events in connection with the schools which the boards may consider a part of the educational program * * *.  The local school boards, subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education, may; (b)  Permit the use of publicly owned school buses for the transportation of citizens for grand jury and other jury functions upon order of the court or as considered necessary by the school board during natural or man-made emergencies, hurricanes, tornadoes, floods and other acts of God * * *.  ; (c)  Enter into agreements or memoranda of understanding with local emergency management officials, law enforcement, or other appropriate agencies to make publicly owned school buses available for use in declared emergencies, natural disasters or other public safety needs, provided that such use does not interfere with the transportation of students to and from school; and * * *The local school boards, subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education, may (d)  Permit the use of publicly owned school buses for the transportation of citizens attending an air show or historic commemorative event held on a military base or military park located in the school district * * *;, provided that such determination shall be made upon the minutes of the school board and shall include an agreement with the military base or military park that it will indemnify and hold the school district harmless in any action regarding such transportation. (2)  (a)  Local school boards may regularly permit the use of motor vehicles other than school buses when the transportation is for trips to and from school sites or for school-related functions and activities; however, motor vehicles other than school buses may not be used for customary transportation between a student's residence and such sites. (b)  When the transportation of students is provided, as authorized in this subsection, in a vehicle other than a school bus that is owned, operated, rented, contracted, or leased by a school district or charter school, the following provisions shall apply: (i)  The vehicle must be a passenger car or multipurpose passenger vehicle or truck, as defined in 49 CFR Part 571, designed to transport fewer than * * *sixteen (16) ten (10) students, excluding the driver * * * and which does not require a commercial driver's license with passenger endorsement. Students must be transported in designated seating positions and must use the occupant crash protection system provided by the manufacturer unless the student's physical condition prohibits such use.  Any motor vehicle designed to transport ten (10) to fifteen (15) passengers, including the driver, when used for transporting students to or from school or school-related events, must meet all Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for school buses set forth in 49 CFR Part 571.  The vehicles, when operated for student transportation under this section does not require a commercial driver's license as prescribed in the Commercial Driver's License Act, established in Section 63-1-201 et seq., provided the vehicle is not designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver. (ii)  An authorized vehicle may not be driven by a student on a public right-of-way.  An authorized vehicle may be driven by a student on school or private property as part of the student's educational curriculum if no other student is in the vehicle. (iii)  The driver of an authorized vehicle transporting students must maintain a valid driver's license and must comply with the requirements of the school district's locally adopted safe driver plan, which includes review of driving records for disqualifying violations. (iv)  The local school board must adopt a policy that addresses procedures and liability for trips under this paragraph, including a provision that school buses are to be used whenever practical and specifying consequences for violation of the policy. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.